Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-805
Election; proposition; contents; sinking fund; creation; use.

The proposition, when submitted to the electors, shall provide for a sinking fund, to which shall be credited the proceeds of loans sold by or repaid to the county; and such fund, when available, shall be used to pay the interest on said bonds and the principal thereof at maturity; Provided, however, any part of the sinking fund may be reloaned for the purposes specified in sections 10-801 to 10-807, when authorized by the county board.

Laws 1913, c. 229, § 6, p. 664;

R.S.1913, § 476;

C.S.1922, § 393;

C.S.1929, § 11-1006;

R.S.1943, § 10-805.